Louisiana, session 2026, SB47.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:1302(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1302. Website; content
The website established pursuant to R.S. 49:1301 shall contain the following
information for boards, commissions, and like entities covered by this Chapter:
* * *
D.(1) Contact information, including the name and phone number of one
or more at least two contacts at the board, commission, or like entity, including the
chairman and the executive director or administrator, if applicable; a mailing
address; an e-mail address, if applicable for each member of the board,
commission, or like entity; a website address, if applicable; and a phone number for
the board, commission, or like entity. The provisions of this Subsection shall not
require the use of public funds to provide a phone to a member of a board,
commission, or like entity. The chairman shall serve as the emergency point of
contact for the board, commission, or like entity.
(2) For any parish board of election supervisors, an email address shall
not be required for each member, and the phone number and website listed
shall be the Department of State elections hotline number and website.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 43:82(5) as redesignated from R.S. 49:1302(5) by Acts 2025, No.
374, is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 47 ENROLLED
§82. Website; content
The commissioner of administration shall post on the Official Journal of the
State the following information for boards and commissions:
* * *
(5)(a) Contact information, including the name and phone number of one
or more at least two contacts at the board or commission, including the chairman
and the executive director or administrator, if applicable; a mailing address; an
email address, if applicable for each board or commission member; a website
address, if applicable; and a phone number for the board or commission. The
provisions of this Paragraph shall not require the use of public funds to provide
a phone to a member of a board or commission. The chairman shall serve as the
emergency point of contact for the board or commission.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, for a parish board of election supervisors, contact information
including the Department of State elections hotline number and website.
* * *
Section 3. The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.